North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-11 Cosmetologists
43-11-28.
Fees.

Fees to be paid by applicants for original registrations, original licenses, renewals, licenses issued upon reciprocity, and examinations as required under this chapter may not exceed the following amounts:

Original registrations, licenses, and annual renewals: MAXIMUM FEE: (1) Salons, original registration $80.00 per year (2) Salons, renewal $30.00 per year (3) School of cosmetology, original registration $505.00 per year (4) School of cosmetology, annual renewal $205.00 per year (5) Cosmetologist, original license $15.00 per year (6) Cosmetologist, annual renewal $15.00 per year (7) Master cosmetologist, original license $25.00 per year (8) Master cosmetologist, annual renewal $20.00 per year (9) Instructor, original license $35.00 per year (10) Instructor, renewal $20.00 per year (11) Reciprocity license fee $105.00 per year (12) Registration fee for student $15.00 per year (13) Duplicate license $10.00 per year (14) Certification fee $20.00 per year b. Late fees: (1) Late renewal within one year $50.00 (2) Late renewal after one year but before five years $150.00 c. Examinations: (1) Cosmetology practical examination $25.00 (2) Instructors practical examination $55.00 (3) Written examination fees are set and collected by the administrator of the examination and payment is the responsibility of the applicant.

Fees are not prorated or returnable.

The board shall sponsor an educational program for licenseholders to carry out the purposes of protecting the public health and safety and maintaining capable and skilled cosmetologists, estheticians, manicurists, and instructors. The board shall use such portion of the renewal fees as the board may determine for the purpose of providing the educational program.

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, §§ 26, 27; 1939, ch. 150, §§ 5, 6; R.C. 1943, § 43-1128; S.L. 1979, ch. 464, § 12; 1985, ch. 477, § 32; 1995, ch. 401, § 5; 1997, ch. 368, § 14; 2003, ch. 360, § 7; 2011, ch. 308, § 11; 2015, ch. 293, §
10, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 309, § 24, effective July 1, 2021.

43-11-29.
License renewal — Failure to renew.

A license issued by the board expires on December thirty-first. If the application for renewal is not received on or before the expiration date, the license expires.

The board may renew a license if:

An application for renewal is submitted as provided by the board;

The renewal fee is paid; and

Grounds for denial do not exist under section 43-11-31.

The holder of an expired license, within one year from and after the date of the license’s expiration, may obtain a reinstatement of the license upon:

Payment of the required late fee; and

Payment of the current renewal fee.

The holder of an expired license, one year after the date of expiration but before five years, may obtain a reinstatement of the license upon:

Payment of the required late fee; and

Furnishing to the board satisfactory proof of passing the North Dakota law, rules, and regulations examination.

The board may not reinstate a license if more than five years has lapsed since the license expired. If a license has not been renewed within five years, the individual may reapply for licensure under the requirements of initial licensure as set forth under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 26; 1939, ch. 150, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 43-1129; S.L. 1985, ch. 477, § 33; 2021, ch. 309, § 25, effective July 1, 2021.

43-11-30.
Revocation or suspension of license.

The board may place on probation, revoke, or suspend a license upon proof of a violation under this chapter or a rule adopted by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 19, subs. 1; 1943, ch. 144, § 1, subs. 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1130; S.L. 1979, ch. 464, § 13; 1985, ch. 477, § 34; 2021, ch. 309, § 26, effective July 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Nolo contendere or non vult, statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of, 89 A.L.R.2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 A.L.R.2d 1210.

43-11-31.
License — Refusal to grant — Grounds.

The board may deny an application or discipline a licensee on any of the following grounds:

Fraud in passing the examination.

Conviction of an offense determined by the board to have a direct bearing upon an individual’s ability to serve the public in a profession licensed by the board, or, following conviction of any offense, the board determines the individual is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Grossly unprofessional or dishonest conduct.

Addiction to the use of intoxicating liquor or drugs to such an extent as to render the individual unfit to practice.

Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements.

Failure to display the license as provided under this chapter.

Violation of the provisions under this chapter or the rules adopted by the board.

Permitting an unlicensed individual to practice cosmetology, or teaching in a cosmetology salon or school of cosmetology.

Advertising or providing services outside of the licensee’s scope of practice as defined under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 19, subs. 2; 1943, ch. 144, § 1, subs. 2; R.C. 1943, § 43-1131; S.L. 1977, ch. 130, § 26; 1979, ch. 464, § 14; 1985, ch. 477, § 35; 2011, ch. 308, § 12; 2021, ch. 309, § 27, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

43-11-32.
Hearings.

All hearings must be conducted pursuant to chapter 28-32. For purposes of a hearing, section 28-32-21 applies only to the licensee.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 43-1132; 1997, ch. 368, § 15; 2001, ch. 293, § 22.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

43-11-33.
Board may subpoena witnesses — Fees — How paid.

The board may require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers at any hearing or with reference to any matter which the board has authority to investigate and, for that purpose, may issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records, or papers. The fees and mileage of witnesses must be the same as may be allowed in the court in criminal cases. Fees and mileage must be paid in the same manner as expenses of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 19, subs. 3; 1943, ch. 144, § 1, subs. 3; R.C. 1943, § 43-1133; S.L. 1985, ch. 477, § 36; 1997, ch. 368, § 16; 2021, ch. 309, § 28, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

Compensation of board members, see N.D.C.C. § 43-11-06.

Sheriff’s fee for service of subpoena, see N.D.C.C. § 11-15-07.

Subpoenas, see ch. 31-03; N.D.R.Civ.P. 45; N.D.R.Crim.P. 17.

Witnesses fee in criminal cases, see N.D.C.C. § 31-01-16.

43-11-34.
Appeal from actions of the board.

An appeal may be taken from an action of the board under this chapter in refusing to grant or in suspending or revoking a license to the district court of the county of residence of the individual who has been refused a license or whose license has been suspended or revoked. The appeal must be taken in accordance with the provisions under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 22; R.C. 1943, § 43-1134; S.L. 1985, ch. 477, § 37; 1997, ch. 368, § 17; 2021, ch. 309, § 29, effective July 1, 2021.

43-11-35.
Penalty.

Any individual who without a license as required under this chapter willfully practices any of the occupations, maintains a school, or acts or advertises in any capacity violates this chapter or rule adopted by the board, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 157, § 28; 1937, ch. 137, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 43-1135; S.L. 1975, ch. 402, § 2; 1985, ch. 477, § 38; 1997, ch. 368, § 18; 2021, ch. 309, § 30, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-11-36.
Minimum fees may be established — Conditions — How. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 435, § 26.